Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1037
Nail technology instructor, defined.

Nail technology instructor means a person licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to teach the practices of nail technology in a nail technology school.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 12;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-361.04;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 299.